Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-524.02
Aquatic invasive species; prohibited
acts; penalty; impoundment of conveyance.

(1) No person shall possess, import, export,
purchase, sell, or transport aquatic invasive species except when authorized
commission personnel or the owner of a conveyance, or a person authorized
by such owner, is removing an aquatic invasive species from a conveyance to
be killed or immediately disposed of in a manner determined by the commission.
The commission shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations governing
the inspection, decontamination, and treatment of conveyances capable of containing
or transporting aquatic invasive species.

(2) Any person
who (a) fails or refuses to submit to an inspection of a conveyance requested
by an authorized inspector or (b) refuses to permit or prevents proper decontamination
or treatment of a conveyance as prescribed by the authorized inspector is
guilty of a Class III misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be fined not less
than five hundred dollars. Such person's conveyance shall also be subject
to impoundment.

Laws 2012, LB391, § 6.